Illinois, session 104th, SB2626.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 5reenacting and changing Section 2-1107.1 and by changing 6Section 2-1117 as follows: 7    (735 ILCS 5/2-1107.1)  (from Ch. 110, par. 2-1107.1)8    (Text of Section WITHOUT the changes made by P.A. 89-7, 9which has been held unconstitutional)10    Sec. 2-1107.1. Jury instruction in tort actions. In all 11actions on account of bodily injury or death or physical 12damage to property based on negligence, or product liability 13based on strict tort liability, the court shall not instruct 14the jury of the consequence of any findings of fault of any 15plaintiff or defendant pursuant to Section 2-1116 or 2-1117 in 16writing that the defendant shall be found not liable if the 17jury finds that the contributory fault of the plaintiff is 18more than 50% of the proximate cause of the injury or damage 19for which recovery is sought.20    The changes to this Section made by this amendatory Act of 21the 104th General Assembly apply to causes of action accruing 22on or after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 23104th General Assembly.  SB2626- 2 -LRB104 12628 JRC 23308 b1(Source: P.A. 84-1431.) 2    (735 ILCS 5/2-1117)  (from Ch. 110, par. 2-1117)3    Sec. 2-1117. Joint liability. Except as provided in 4Section 2-1118, in actions on account of bodily injury or 5death or physical damage to property, based on negligence, or 6product liability based on strict tort liability, all 7defendants found liable are jointly and severally liable for 8plaintiff's past and future medical and medically related 9expenses. Any defendant whose fault, as determined by the 10trier of fact, is less than 25% of the proximate cause of the 11injury or damage for which recovery is sought by the plaintiff 12total fault attributable to the plaintiff, the defendants sued 13by the plaintiff, and any third party defendant except the 14plaintiff's employer, shall be severally liable for all other 15damages. Any defendant whose fault, as determined by the trier 16of fact, is 25% or greater of the proximate cause of the injury 17or damage for which recovery is sought by the plaintiff total 18fault attributable to the plaintiff, the defendants sued by 19the plaintiff, and any third party defendants except the 20plaintiff's employer, shall be jointly and severally liable 21for all other damages.22    The changes to this Section made by this amendatory Act of 23the 104th General Assembly apply to causes of action accruing 24on or after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 25104th General Assembly.  SB2626- 3 -LRB104 12628 JRC 23308 b1(Source: P.A. 93-10, eff. 6-4-03; 93-12, eff. 6-4-03.)